Utah statutes.
10-9a-516.   Residential facilities for elderly persons.

(1)  A residential facility for elderly persons may not operate as a business.

(2)  A residential facility for elderly persons shall:

(a)  be owned by one of the residents or by an immediate family member of one of the residents or be a facility for which the title has been placed in trust for a resident;

(b)  be consistent with any existing, applicable land use ordinance affecting the desired location; and

(c)  be occupied on a 24-hour-per-day basis by eight or fewer elderly persons in a family-type arrangement.

(3)  A residential facility for elderly persons may not be considered a business because a fee is charged for food or for actual and necessary costs of operation and maintenance of the facility.

